Utah statutes.
31A-23a-203.   Training period requirements.

(1)  A producer is eligible to add the surplus lines of authority to the person's producer's license if the producer:

(a)  has passed the applicable examination;

(b)  has been a producer with property and casualty lines of authority for at least three years during the four years immediately preceding the date of application; and

(c)  has paid the applicable fee under Section 31A-3-103.

(2)  A person is eligible to become a consultant only if the person has acted in a capacity that would provide the person with preparation to act as an insurance consultant for a period aggregating not less than three years during the four years immediately preceding the date of application.

(3)  The training periods required under this section apply only to an individual applying for a license under this chapter.

